Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2. Licensed Buildings

§ 12-5-201.
Location, regulation and restrictions as to place of sale; inspections.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the principal place in which alcoholic liquor and malt beverages are sold under a license shall be located in the licensed building for which the license is issued and as approved by the licensing authority. Alcoholic beverages may be served only in the licensed building and in an immediately adjacent fenced or enclosed area as approved by the local licensing authority. This adjacent area shall not be in another building. The licensing authority shall, as often as necessary, inspect the licensed building and adjacent areas where alcoholic beverages are served to insure that the licensee is in compliance with sanitation and fire hazard requirements and other applicable laws.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 63, § 2.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a licensee who holds a license other than a club license issued under W.S.

12-4-301

or restaurant license issued under W.S.

12-4-407

, and who is engaged in a business operation with motel or hotel sleeping room accommodations at the same premises may sell alcoholic liquor and malt beverages in sealed containers from a minibar located in any sleeping room of the licensee’s motel or hotel operation occupied by a registered guest twenty-one (21) years of age or older. Sales under this subsection shall be only to registered guests age twenty-one (21) years or more, are not subject to hours of operation set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

and shall be only for consumption within the motel or hotel sleeping room premises occupied by the guest. Restrictions imposed upon minors under W.S.

12-6-101

apply to sales authorized under this subsection. The price imposed upon alcoholic liquor, malt beverages and all other items available for sale from the minibar shall be clearly posted. A minibar used for purposes of this subsection shall be a closed container, refrigerated or nonrefrigerated, access to the interior of which is restricted by means of a locking device requiring the use of a key, magnetic card or similar device. The appropriate licensing authority may impose additional reasonable restrictions on the operation of a minibar licensed under this subsection.

A holder of a resort retail liquor license, a golf club that holds a retail liquor license, a restaurant liquor license or a club limited retail liquor license or a holder of a retail liquor license or restaurant liquor license operating on a guest ranch may dispense alcoholic beverages from any location within the boundaries of the licensee’s premises. The premises shall be a single property within a contiguous boundary upon which the licensee is located and which shall be identified in the license. Any location on the premises where alcoholic beverages are dispensed as approved by the licensing authority shall comply with applicable sanitation and fire hazard requirements and other applicable laws. The licensing authority shall, as often as necessary, inspect the licensed location where alcoholic beverages are dispensed to ensure that the licensee is in compliance with sanitation and fire hazard requirements.

through (j) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

A licensing authority may authorize a licensee holding a retail liquor license issued under W.S.

12-4-201

to hold an event in the licensed building at which persons under the age of twenty-one (21) are permitted if:

No alcoholic liquor or malt beverages are sold, served, consumed or possessed by any person attending the event;

No alcoholic liquor or malt beverages are accessible to persons attending the event;

The licensee otherwise complies with any additional conditions which may be imposed by rule and regulation of the appropriate licensing authority, including revocation of the authorization to hold the youth event.

Nothing under this act shall prohibit more than one (1) liquor license holder to operate within the same building provided that each licensee maintains distinct areas within the building.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 17; 1945, ch. 133, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 53-217; Laws 1953, ch. 206, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-20; Laws 1961, ch. 172, § 3; 1963, ch. 162, § 1; 1971, ch. 81, § 1; 1973, ch. 50, § 1; 1977, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-122; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1991, ch. 66, § 1; ch. 120, § 1; 1993, ch. 126, § 1; 1995, ch. 88, § 1; ch. 116, § 1; 1999, ch. 21, § 1; 2001, ch. 103, § 1; 2006, ch. 49, § 1; 2008, ch. 77, § 1; 2009, ch. 42, § 1; 2017 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment

added the exception language at the beginning of (a); in (g), inserted “retail liquor license or a” in two places, inserted “golf clubs as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(iii)(D) which are,” and deleted “for which a club limited retail liquor license is issued” following “golf club premises.”

Laws 2006 ch. 49, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a), in the fifth sentence inserted “promotional products bearing the name of the licensed retailer, billiard and dart supplies, newspapers, magazines and periodicals”, and made related stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence in (g).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (e), substituted “set pursuant to
W.S.

12-5-101

” for “imposed under
W.S.

12-5-101

.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (b) through (d) regarding additional dispensing rooms.

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in (f), rewrote the first sentence, which read, "A holder of a resort retail liquor license may dispense alcoholic beverages from any location within the boundaries of the resort premises," deleted "resort" preceding "premises" in the second and third sentences and substituted "licensee" for "resort" preceding "is located."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 3, The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (g), which read, "Any golf club as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(iii)(D) which holds a retail liquor license or a club limited retail liquor license under W.S.

12-4-301

may dispense alcoholic beverages from any location within the boundaries of the golf club premises. The premises shall be a single property within a contiguous boundary upon which the golf club is located and which shall be identified in the license. Any location on the golf club premises where alcoholic beverages are dispensed as approved by the licensing authority shall comply with applicable sanitation and fire hazard requirements and other applicable laws. The licensing authority shall, as often as necessary, inspect the licensed location where alcoholic beverages are dispensed to ensure that the licensee is in compliance with sanitation and fire hazard requirements. Any political subdivision issued a club limited retail liquor license for use at a bona fide golf course may contract for or otherwise subcontract the operations of the golf course or any food and beverage services associated therewith to another individual or entity without transferring the license thereto"; repealed (h), which read, "With the approval and on the conditions imposed by the licensing authority, any restaurant liquor licensee operating on a golf course may dispense alcoholic beverages from any location on the premises of the golf course. Holders shall comply with all applicable sanitation and fire hazard requirements, and other applicable laws"; and repealed (j), which read, "Any retail or restaurant liquor licensee operating on a guest ranch as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(xxiii) may dispense alcoholic beverages from any location within the boundaries of the guest ranch premises. The guest ranch premises shall be a single property within a contiguous boundary upon which the guest ranch is located and which shall be identified in the license. The licensing authority shall, as often as necessary, inspect the licensed location where alcoholic beverages are dispensed to ensure that the licensee is in compliance with sanitation and fire hazard requirements and other applicable laws."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Former provision superseded by Fair Employment Practices Act. —

The sentence formerly contained in this section which read “No female shall be employed as a bartender in a room holding a retail liquor license” was superseded and repealed by implication with the enactment of the Fair Employment Practices Act. Longacre v. State, 448 P.2d 832,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1968).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of statute or ordinance respecting amusements on premises licensed for sale of intoxicating liquor, 4 ALR2d 1216.

Zoning regulation in respect of intoxicating liquors, 9 ALR2d 877.

Validity and construction of ordinance respecting the licensing of women for employment in places where intoxicating liquors are sold, 46 ALR3d 369.

§ 12-5-202.
Storage outside licensed premises prohibited; exception.

A retail licensee shall not store alcoholic liquor or malt beverages outside of the licensed building unless he files with the division a written statement that he stores alcoholic liquors or malt beverages in a place other than his place of business and states the exact location of the storage place.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 117,§ 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, § 53-102; W.S. 1957, § 12-39(c); W.S. 1977, §

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51,§ 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “building” for “premises.”

§ 12-5-203.
Minors restricted from dispensing room; exception; penalty. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; repealed by 2017 ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 12-5-204.
Prohibited acts within dispensing room; violation cause for suspension or revocation of license or permit. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; repealed by 2017 ch. 50, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.